New Jersey, session 221, A4475.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  Any domestic violence counseling program in which a defendant participates based on a court order issued pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection b. of section 13 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-29) or as a condition of pretrial release pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-16) shall facilitate offender accountability and contain the following components: a.     Risk assessments that identify dynamics of domestic violence and escalating risk factors, and include information provided by the courts; b.    Information and education concerning the tactics of power and control and the understanding of domestic violence as a domination and control issue; c.     A protocol to demonstrate the defendants attendance in programming, and additional reporting as requested by the court to support a prompt and effective review by the court for noncompliance; and d.    Regular reviews of the program and compliance by the New Jersey Department of Children and Families for Batterers Intervention Programs funded by the Department of Children and Families. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment.